Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that:(1) Parkinson's disease is a progressive neurodegenerative disorder that leads to a range of symptoms that worsen over time, imposing significant health, caregiving, and economic burdens on individuals, families, and communities. Researchers believe that Parkinson's disease arises from a combination of genetic, environmental, and aging-related factors. Mounting scientific evidence has identified associations between environmental exposures, including certain pesticides, and an elevated risk of Parkinson's disease.(2) Environmental risk factors, including occupational exposures in agricultural and rural settings, have been scientifically linked with the increased likelihood of developing Parkinson's disease and paraquat dichloride has been identified in peer-reviewed literature as associated with higher Parkinson's risk estimates among exposed populations.(3) Washington's agricultural economy depends on the contributions of farmworkers, pesticide handlers, and rural communities, and that these workers and residents may experience disproportionate exposure to chemical agents suspected of contributing to Parkinson's disease risk. Protecting the health and safety of agricultural workers and all Washington residents is a matter of statewide public health concern.(4) Alternative weed management practices and herbicidal tools are available and used in agricultural production, providing options for effective crop management while reducing reliance on chemical agents associated with health risks.(5) It is in the best interest of Washington to protect public health by reducing preventable exposure to paraquat and to support the transition to safer and sustainable agricultural practices while preserving the long-term vitality of Washington agriculture.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 15.58 RCW to read as follows:(1) A person may not use, sell, distribute, apply, or handle any herbicide containing paraquat. The director may authorize the limited use of paraquat for research conducted under strict safety and reporting protocols.(2) The director may adopt rules to implement and enforce this section.(3) For the purposes of this section, "paraquat" means paraquat dichloride or any other chemical form of paraquat.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act takes effect January 1, 2027.--- END ---